Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1835
Expenses; how paid; liability; limitation.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority Act shall be payable solely from funds provided under the act, and no liability or obligation shall be incurred by the authority beyond the extent to which money has been provided under the act.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 35.